Maine, session 132, LD2065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to support the construction of a psychiatric residential
treatment facility for at-risk youth under 21 years of age.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $1,100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,100,000